Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.196

Helping Kids Speak license plates.

"Helping Kids Speak license plates" means license plates that display a symbol of an organization that supports programs that provide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to children who have a severe delay in language or speech development.

[ 2004 c 48 s 2.]